Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB447.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1303 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1303. Immunization Required; Penalty.--* * *(e) A public school entity, nonpublic school, political subdivision or the Commonwealth shall include with any notice, publication, posting or provision of information containing new, existing or updated immunization requirements issued by the Commonwealth the following information in the same size and font as the notice, publication, posting or provision:(1) The exemptions from immunization requirements under subsections (c) and (d).1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) That the public school entity, nonpublic school, political subdivision or the Commonwealth accepts the exemptions from immunization requirements under subsections (c) and (d).(3) The process by which a child may obtain an exemption from immunization requirements.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Nonpublic school" shall have the same meaning given to the term under section 923-A."Public school entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0447PN0425 - 2 - 1234567891011121314